Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-4020
Violations; penalty.

Any person violating any of the provisions of sections 2-4001 to 2-4020 shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor.

Laws 1981, LB 11, § 20.